test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IIHL_STEM_2.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_IIHL_STEM_2 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_IIHL_STEM_2

     níihl+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: nílga
     níihl+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: nílgang
     níihl+V+DIRECT+PAST: nílgan
     níihl+V+NON_FACTIVE: níl.ang
     níihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: nílgang
     níihl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: nílganggang
     níihl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: nílgangang
     níihl+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: nílgiinii
     níihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: nílgaangaa
     níihl+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: nílgaangaan
     níihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: nílang ñasa'áa
     níihl+V+NEAR+FUTURE: nílang ñasa'áang
     níihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: nílang ñasaasdláa
     níihl+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: nílang ñasaasdláang
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: nílgang'waa
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: nílgang'waang
     níihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: nílgang'waa.ang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: nílgang'anggang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: nílgang'angang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: nílang ñasaa'áng
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: nílang ñasaa'ánggang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: nílang ñasaasdlä'áng
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: nílang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: nílgang'ang'waa
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: nílgang'ang'waang
     níihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: nílgang'ang'waa.ang
